Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB433.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 914-A(11) and 919.1-A(a) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, are amended to read:Section 914-A. Powers and Duties of the Intermediate Unit Board of Directors.--An intermediate unit board of directors shall have the power and its duty shall be:* * * (11) To [lease] acquire land and buildings by purchase, lease or gift and to own office space and warehouse facilities.* * *Section 919.1-A. Capital Subsidy.--(a) All lease 1234567891011121314151617181920 agreements, security agreements, loan agreements, mortgages or any other contracts, instruments or agreements for office space, classrooms, warehouse space and [similar] other facilities shall be pre-approved by the Secretary of Education. [Loan agreements and mortgages for office and warehouse facilities shall be pre-approved by the Secretary of Education.] For the 1977-1978 school year and each school year thereafter, in addition to any payments required under section 917.1-A, the Commonwealth shall allocate to the intermediate units, on account of approved lease agreements, loan agreements, mortgages, security agreements or any other contracts, instruments or agreements, an amount to be determined as follows: by obtaining the product of the number of students in average daily membership (ADM) multiplied by the median actual instruction expense per weighted average daily membership of all the school districts, to be further multiplied by three one-hundredths of one percent (0.03%), based on the latest actual data available to the Secretary of Education.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0433PN0401 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819